Utah statutes.
57-8-12.   Recording.
(1)  The declaration, any amendment, any instrument by which the provisions of
this act may be waived, and every instrument affecting the property or any
unit shall be entitled to be recorded. Neither the declaration nor any
amendment thereof shall be valid unless recorded.
(2)  In addition to the records and indexes now required to be maintained by
the recorder, the recorder shall maintain an index whereby the record of each
condominium project contains a reference to the declaration, each conveyance
of, lien against, and all other instruments referring to a unit affected by
such declaration, and the record of each conveyance of, lien against, and all
other instruments referring to a unit shall contain a reference to the
declaration of the property of which the unit is a part.
